Utah statutes.
20A-7-309.   Form of ballot -- Manner of voting.

(1)  The county clerks shall ensure that the number and ballot title verified to them by the lieutenant governor are presented upon the official ballot with, immediately adjacent to them, the words "For" and "Against," each word presented with an adjacent square in which the elector may indicate the elector's vote.

(2) (a) (i)  A voter desiring to vote in favor of the law that is the subject of the referendum shall mark the square adjacent to the word "For."

(ii)  The law that is the subject of the referendum takes effect if a majority of voters mark "For."

(b) (i)  A voter desiring to vote against the law that is the subject of the referendum petition shall mark the square adjacent to the word "Against."

(ii)  The law that is the subject of the referendum does not take effect if a majority of voters mark "Against."

